North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 7. Competency of Witnesses.
§ 8-53.14.
Communications between behavior analyst and client or patient.

No individual authorized as a licensed behavior analyst, or any of the individual’s employees or associates, shall be required to disclose any information that the individual may have acquired in the practice of behavior analysis and which information was necessary to enable the individual to practice behavior analysis. Any resident or presiding judge in the district in which the action is pending may, subject to

G.S. 8-53.6

, compel disclosure, either at or before trial, if in the judge’s opinion, disclosure is necessary to a proper administration of justice. If the case is in district court, the judge shall be a district court judge, and if the case is in superior court, the judge shall be a superior court judge.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the behavior analyst-client or behavior analyst-patient privilege shall not be grounds for failure to report suspected child abuse or neglect to the appropriate county department of social services or for failure to report a disabled adult suspected to be in need of protective services to the appropriate county department of social services. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the behavior analyst-client or behavior analyst-patient privilege shall not be grounds for excluding any evidence of abuse, neglect, illness, or injuries of a child or for excluding any evidence regarding the abuse, neglect, exploitation, illness, or injuries of a disabled adult in any judicial proceeding related to a report pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

History.

2021-22, s. 3.

§ 8-54.
Defendant in criminal action competent but not compellable to testify.

In the trial of all indictments, complaints, or other proceedings against persons charged with the commission of crimes, offenses or misdemeanors, the person so charged is, at his own request, but not otherwise, a competent witness, and his failure to make such request shall not create any presumption against him. But every such person examined as a witness shall be subject to cross-examination as other witnesses. Except as above provided, nothing in this section shall render any person, who in any criminal proceeding is charged with the commission of a criminal offense, competent or compellable to give evidence against himself, nor render any person compellable to answer any question tending to criminate himself.

History.

1856-7, c. 23; 1866, c. 43, s. 3; 1868-9, c. 209, s. 4; 1881, c. 89, s. 3; c. 110, ss. 2, 3; Code ss. 1353, 1354; Rev., ss. 1634, 1635; C.S., s. 1799.

Cross References.

As to rights of accused, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 23.

As to exceptions, i.e., where witness is not excused from testifying on ground that testimony will tend to incriminate him, see

G.S. 1-357

, 14-38, 14-354.

Legal Periodicals.

For article discussing self-incrimination, see 15 N.C.L. Rev. 229 (1937).

For note concerning confessions, see 23 N.C.L. Rev. 364 (1945).

As to compelling accused to speak so that witness may identify his voice, see note in 27 N.C.L. Rev. 262 (1949).

For note, “Constitutional Law — Is the Restricted Cross-Examination Rule Embodied in the Fifth Amendment?”, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 1030 (1967).

For note discussing sua sponte instructions on a defendant’s failure to testify, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 1001 (1976).

For comment on impeaching a criminal defendant by prior acquittals, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 561 (1981).

For article, “An Analysis of the New North Carolina Evidence Code,” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (1984).

§ 8-55.
Testimony enforced in certain criminal investigations; immunity.

If any justice, judge or magistrate of the General Court of Justice shall have good reason to believe that any person within his jurisdiction has knowledge of the existence and establishment of any faro bank, faro table or other gaming table prohibited by law, or of any place where alcoholic beverages are sold contrary to law, in any town or county within his jurisdiction, such person not being minded to make voluntary information thereof on oath, then it shall be lawful for such justice, magistrate, or judge to issue to the sheriff of the county in which such faro bank, faro table, gaming table, or place where alcoholic beverages are sold contrary to law is supposed to be a subpoena, capias ad testificandum, or other summons in writing, commanding such person to appear immediately before such justice, magistrate, or judge and give evidence on oath as to what he may know touching the existence, establishment and whereabouts of such faro bank, faro table or other gaming table, or place where alcoholic beverages are sold contrary to law, and the name and personal description of the keeper thereof. Such evidence, when obtained, shall be considered and held in law as an information on oath, and the justice, magistrate or judge may thereupon proceed to seize and arrest such keeper and destroy such table, or issue process therefor as provided by law. No person shall be excused, on any prosecution, from testifying touching any unlawful gaming done by himself or others; but no discovery made by the witness upon such examination shall be used against him in any penal or criminal prosecution, and he shall be altogether pardoned of the offenses so done or participated in by him.

History.

R.C., c. 35, s. 50; 1858-9, c. 34, s. 1; Code, ss. 1050, 1215; 1889, c. 355; Rev., ss. 1637, 3721; 1913, c. 141; C.S., s. 1800; 1969, c. 44, s. 22; 1971, c. 381, s. 4; 1981, c. 412, s. 4(4); c. 747, s. 66.

§ 8-56.
Husband and wife as witnesses in civil action.

In any trial or inquiry in any suit, action or proceeding in any court, or before any person having, by law or consent of parties, authority to examine witnesses or hear evidence, the husband or wife of any party thereto, or of any person in whose behalf any such suit, action or proceeding is brought, prosecuted, opposed or defended, shall, except as herein stated, be competent and compellable to give evidence, as any other witness on behalf of any party to such suit, action or proceeding. No husband or wife shall be compellable to disclose any confidential communication made by one to the other during their marriage.

History.

1866, c. 43, ss. 3, 4; C.C.P., s. 341; Code, s. 588; Rev., s. 1636; 1919, c. 18; C.S., s. 1801; 1945, c. 635; 1977, c. 547; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1037, s. 3.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on privileged communications between husband and wife, see 15 N.C.L. Rev. 282 (1937).

As to competency of husband and wife to testify in action for criminal conversation, see 26 N.C.L. Rev. 206 (1948).

For note on privileged communications between husband and wife, see 46 N.C.L. Rev. 643 (1968).

For note on testimony by one spouse against the other concerning adultery, see 48 N.C.L. Rev. 131 (1969).

For comment surveying North Carolina law of relational privilege, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 630 (1972).

For survey of 1976 case law on evidence, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1033 (1977).

For note on spousal testimony in criminal proceedings, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 990 (1981).

For comment on adverse marital testimony in criminal actions after the modification of the common-law rule by State v. Freeman,

302 N.C. 591

, 276 S.E.2d 450 (1981), see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 874 (1982).

For article, “An Analysis of the New North Carolina Evidence Code,” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (1984).

§ 8-57.
Husband and wife as witnesses in criminal actions.

The spouse of the defendant shall be a competent witness for the defendant in all criminal actions, but the failure of the defendant to call such spouse as a witness shall not be used against him. Such spouse is subject to cross-examination as are other witnesses.

The spouse of the defendant shall be competent but not compellable to testify for the State against the defendant in any criminal action or grand jury proceedings, except that the spouse of the defendant shall be both competent and compellable to so testify:

In a prosecution for bigamy or criminal cohabitation, to prove the fact of marriage and facts tending to show the absence of divorce or annulment;

In a prosecution for assaulting or communicating a threat to the other spouse;

In a prosecution for trespass in or upon the separate lands or residence of the other spouse when living separate and apart from each other by mutual consent or court order;

In a prosecution for abandonment of or failure to provide support for the other spouse or their child;

In a prosecution of one spouse for any other criminal offense against the minor child of either spouse, including any child of either spouse who is born out of wedlock or adopted or a foster child.

No husband or wife shall be compellable in any event to disclose any confidential communication made by one to the other during their marriage.

History.

1856-7, c. 23; 1866, c. 43; 1868-9, c. 209; 1881, c. 110; Code, ss. 588, 1353, 1354; Rev., ss. 1634, 1635, 1636; C.S., s. 1802; 1933, c. 13, s. 1; c. 361; 1951, c. 296; 1957, c. 1036; 1967, c. 116; 1971, c. 800; 1973, c. 1286, s. 11; 1983, c. 170, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 843, s. 5; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1040, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1039, s. 4; 1991, c, 686, s. 3; 2013-198, s. 2.

§ 8-57.1.
Husband-wife privilege waived in child abuse.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 8-56

and

G.S. 8-57

, the husband-wife privilege shall not be ground for excluding evidence regarding the abuse or neglect of a child under the age of 16 years or regarding an illness of or injuries to such child or the cause thereof in any judicial proceeding related to a report pursuant to the Child Abuse Reporting Law, Article 3 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

History.

1971, c. 710, s. 3; 1998-202, s. 13(d).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment surveying North Carolina law of relational privilege, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 630 (1972).

For note on spousal testimony in criminal proceedings, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 990 (1981).

For note, “Family Law—Lovers’ Triangle Turns Bermuda Triangle: The Natural Father’s Right to Rebut the Marital Presumption—Michael H. v. Gerald D.,” see 25 Wake Forest L. Rev. 617 (1990).

§ 8-57.2.
Presumed father or mother as witnesses where paternity at issue.

Whenever an issue of paternity of a child born or conceived during a marriage arises in any civil or criminal proceeding, the presumed father or the mother of such child is competent to give evidence as to any relevant matter regarding paternity of the child, including nonaccess to the present or former spouse, regardless of any privilege which may otherwise apply. No parent offering such evidence shall thereafter be prosecuted based upon that evidence for any criminal act involved in the conception of the child whose paternity is in issue and/or for whom support is sought, except for perjury committed in this testimony.

History.

1981, c. 634, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on spousal testimony in criminal proceedings, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 990 (1981).

For survey of 1981 law on evidence, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1359 (1982).

§ 8-58.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, ss. 11, 26.

§ 8-58.1.
Injured party as witness when medical charges at issue.

Whenever an issue of hospital, medical, dental, pharmaceutical, or funeral charges arises in any civil proceeding, the injured party or his guardian, administrator, or executor is competent to give evidence regarding the amount paid or required to be paid in full satisfaction of such charges, provided that records or copies of such charges showing the amount paid or required to be paid in full satisfaction of such charges accompany such testimony.

The testimony of a person pursuant to subsection (a) of this section establishes a rebuttable presumption of the reasonableness of the amount paid or required to be paid in full satisfaction of the charges. However, in the event that the provider of hospital, medical, dental, pharmaceutical, or funeral services gives sworn testimony that the charge for that provider’s service either was satisfied by payment of an amount less than the amount charged, or can be satisfied by payment of an amount less than the amount charged, then with respect to that provider’s charge only, the presumption of the reasonableness of the amount charged is rebutted and a rebuttable presumption is established that the lesser satisfaction amount is the reasonable amount of the charges for the testifying provider’s services. For the purposes of this subsection, the word “provider” shall include the agent or employee of a provider of hospital, medical, dental, pharmaceutical, or funeral services, or a person with responsibility to pay a provider of hospital, medical, dental, pharmaceutical, or funeral services on behalf of an injured party.

The fact that a provider charged for services provided to the injured person establishes a permissive presumption that the services provided were reasonably necessary but no presumption is established that the services provided were necessary because of injuries caused by the acts or omissions of an alleged tortfeasor.

History.

1983, c. 776, s. 1; 2011-283, s. 1.2; 2011-317, s. 1.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-283, s. 1.2, as amended by Session Laws 2011-317, s. 1.1, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to actions arising on or after that date, added the subsection (a) designation, and therein inserted “paid or required to be paid in full satisfaction” and “showing the amount paid or required to be paid in full satisfaction of such charges”; added the subsection (b) designation, and therein, in the first sentence, substituted “testimony of a person pursuant to subsection (a) of this section” for “testimony of such a person” and inserted “paid or required to be paid in full satisfaction,” and added the last two sentences; and added subsection (c).

§§ 8-58.2 through 8-58.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.